test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-e_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - lope:
    lope+N+Sg+Nom: lope
    lope+N+Sg+Gen: love
    lope+N+Sg+Acc: love
    lope+N+Sg+Ill: lopán
    lope+N+Sg+Loc: looveest
    lope+N+Sg+Com: luvvijn
    lope+N+Sg+Abe: lovettáá
    lope+N+Ess: loppeen
    lope+N+Par: loppeed
    lope+N+Pl+Nom: loveh
    lope+N+Pl+Gen: [luuvij, luvij]
    lope+N+Pl+Acc: luuvijd
    lope+N+Pl+Ill: luvvijd
    lope+N+Pl+Loc: luuvijn
    lope+N+Pl+Com: luvijguin
    lope+N+Pl+Abe: luvijttáá

  Noun - kope:
    kope+N+Sg+Nom: kope
    kope+N+Sg+Gen: kove
    kope+N+Sg+Acc: kove
    kope+N+Sg+Ill: kopán
    kope+N+Sg+Loc: kooveest
    kope+N+Sg+Com: kuvvijn
    kope+N+Sg+Abe: kovettáá
    kope+N+Ess: koppeen
    kope+N+Par: koppeed
    kope+N+Pl+Nom: koveh
    kope+N+Pl+Gen: [kuuvij, kuvij]
    kope+N+Pl+Acc: kuuvijd
    kope+N+Pl+Ill: kuvvijd
    kope+N+Pl+Loc: kuuvijn
    kope+N+Pl+Com: kuvijguin
    kope+N+Pl+Abe: kuvijttáá

  Noun - tupe:
    tupe+N+Sg+Nom: tupe
    tupe+N+Sg+Gen: tuve
    tupe+N+Sg+Acc: tuve
    tupe+N+Sg+Ill: tupán
    tupe+N+Sg+Loc: tuuveest
    tupe+N+Sg+Com: tuvvijn
    tupe+N+Sg+Abe: tuvettáá
    tupe+N+Ess: tuppeen
    tupe+N+Par: tuppeed
    tupe+N+Pl+Nom: tuveh
    tupe+N+Pl+Gen: [tuuvij, tuvij]
    tupe+N+Pl+Acc: tuuvijd
    tupe+N+Pl+Ill: tuvvijd
    tupe+N+Pl+Loc: tuuvijn
    tupe+N+Pl+Com: tuvijguin
    tupe+N+Pl+Abe: tuvijttáá

  Noun - supe:
    supe+N+Sg+Nom: supe
    supe+N+Sg+Gen: suve
    supe+N+Sg+Acc: suve
    supe+N+Sg+Ill: supán
    supe+N+Sg+Loc: suuveest
    supe+N+Sg+Com: suvvijn
    supe+N+Sg+Abe: suvettáá
    supe+N+Ess: suppeen
    supe+N+Par: suppeed
    supe+N+Pl+Nom: suveh
    supe+N+Pl+Gen: [suuvij, suvij]
    supe+N+Pl+Acc: suuvijd
    supe+N+Pl+Ill: suvvijd
    supe+N+Pl+Loc: suuvijn
    supe+N+Pl+Com: suvijguin
    supe+N+Pl+Abe: suvijttáá

  Noun - njihe:
    njihe+N+Sg+Nom: njihe
    njihe+N+Sg+Gen: njive
    njihe+N+Sg+Acc: njive
    njihe+N+Sg+Ill: njihán
    njihe+N+Sg+Loc: njivveest
    njihe+N+Sg+Com: njivvijn
    njihe+N+Sg+Abe: njivettáá
    njihe+N+Ess: njihheen
    njihe+N+Par: njihheed
    njihe+N+Pl+Nom: njiveh
    njihe+N+Pl+Gen: [njiivij, njivij]
    njihe+N+Pl+Acc: njiivijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Ill: njivvijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Loc: njiivijn
    njihe+N+Pl+Com: njivijguin
    njihe+N+Pl+Abe: njivijttáá

  Noun - mote:
    mote+N+Sg+Nom: mote
    mote+N+Sg+Gen: mođe
    mote+N+Sg+Acc: mođe
    mote+N+Sg+Ill: motán
    mote+N+Sg+Loc: moođeest
    mote+N+Sg+Com: muuđijn
    mote+N+Sg+Abe: mođettáá
    mote+N+Ess: motteen
    mote+N+Par: motteed
    mote+N+Pl+Nom: mođeh
    mote+N+Pl+Gen: [muuđij, muđij]
    mote+N+Pl+Acc: muuđijd
    mote+N+Pl+Ill: muuđijd
    mote+N+Pl+Loc: muuđijn
    mote+N+Pl+Com: muđijguin
    mote+N+Pl+Abe: muđijttáá

  Noun - lakke:
    lakke+N+Sg+Nom: lakke
    lakke+N+Sg+Gen: lahe
    lakke+N+Sg+Acc: lahe
    lakke+N+Sg+Ill: laakan
    lakke+N+Sg+Loc: lahheest
    lakke+N+Sg+Com: lohhijn
    lakke+N+Sg+Abe: lahettáá
    lakke+N+Ess: lakken
    lakke+N+Par: lakked
    lakke+N+Pl+Nom: laheh
    lakke+N+Pl+Gen: [loohij, lohij]
    lakke+N+Pl+Acc: loohijd
    lakke+N+Pl+Ill: lohhijd
    lakke+N+Pl+Loc: loohijn
    lakke+N+Pl+Com: lohijguin
    lakke+N+Pl+Abe: lohijttáá

  Noun - lokke:
    lokke+N+Sg+Nom: lokke
    lokke+N+Sg+Gen: lohe
    lokke+N+Sg+Acc: lohe
    lokke+N+Sg+Ill: lookán
    lokke+N+Sg+Loc: lohheest
    lokke+N+Sg+Com: luhhijn
    lokke+N+Sg+Abe: lohettáá
    lokke+N+Ess: lokken
    lokke+N+Par: lokked
    lokke+N+Pl+Nom: loheh
    lokke+N+Pl+Gen: [luuhij, luhij]
    lokke+N+Pl+Acc: luuhijd
    lokke+N+Pl+Ill: luhhijd
    lokke+N+Pl+Loc: luuhijn
    lokke+N+Pl+Com: luhijguin
    lokke+N+Pl+Abe: luhijttáá

  Noun - rokke:
    rokke+N+Sg+Nom: rokke
    rokke+N+Sg+Gen: rohe
    rokke+N+Sg+Acc: rohe
    rokke+N+Sg+Ill: rookán
    rokke+N+Sg+Loc: rohheest
    rokke+N+Sg+Com: ruhhijn
    rokke+N+Sg+Abe: rohettáá
    rokke+N+Ess: rokken
    rokke+N+Par: rokked
    rokke+N+Pl+Nom: roheh
    rokke+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuhij, ruhij]
    rokke+N+Pl+Acc: ruuhijd
    rokke+N+Pl+Ill: ruhhijd
    rokke+N+Pl+Loc: ruuhijn
    rokke+N+Pl+Com: ruhijguin
    rokke+N+Pl+Abe: ruhijttáá

  Noun - čukke:
    čukke+N+Sg+Nom: čukke
    čukke+N+Sg+Gen: čuhe
    čukke+N+Sg+Acc: čuhe
    čukke+N+Sg+Ill: čuukán
    čukke+N+Sg+Loc: čuhheest
    čukke+N+Sg+Com: čuhhijn
    čukke+N+Sg+Abe: čuhettáá
    čukke+N+Ess: čukken
    čukke+N+Par: čukked
    čukke+N+Pl+Nom: čuheh
    čukke+N+Pl+Gen: [čuuhij, čuhij]
    čukke+N+Pl+Acc: čuuhijd
    čukke+N+Pl+Ill: čuhhijd
    čukke+N+Pl+Loc: čuuhijn
    čukke+N+Pl+Com: čuhijguin
    čukke+N+Pl+Abe: čuhijttáá

  Noun - mokke:
    mokke+N+Sg+Nom: mokke
    mokke+N+Sg+Gen: mohe
    mokke+N+Sg+Acc: mohe
    mokke+N+Sg+Ill: mookán
    mokke+N+Sg+Loc: mohheest
    mokke+N+Sg+Com: muhhijn
    mokke+N+Sg+Abe: mohettáá
    mokke+N+Ess: mokken
    mokke+N+Par: mokked
    mokke+N+Pl+Nom: moheh
    mokke+N+Pl+Gen: [muuhij, muhij]
    mokke+N+Pl+Acc: muuhijd
    mokke+N+Pl+Ill: muhhijd
    mokke+N+Pl+Loc: muuhijn
    mokke+N+Pl+Com: muhijguin
    mokke+N+Pl+Abe: muhijttáá

  Noun - tikke:
    tikke+N+Sg+Nom: tikke
    tikke+N+Sg+Gen: tihe
    tikke+N+Sg+Acc: tihe
    tikke+N+Sg+Ill: tiikán
    tikke+N+Sg+Loc: tihheest
    tikke+N+Sg+Com: tihhijn
    tikke+N+Sg+Abe: tihettáá
    tikke+N+Ess: tikken
    tikke+N+Par: tikked
    tikke+N+Pl+Nom: tiheh
    tikke+N+Pl+Gen: [tiihij, tihij]
    tikke+N+Pl+Acc: tiihijd
    tikke+N+Pl+Ill: tihhijd
    tikke+N+Pl+Loc: tiihijn
    tikke+N+Pl+Com: tihijguin
    tikke+N+Pl+Abe: tihijttáá

  Noun - tigge:
    tigge+N+Sg+Nom: tigge
    tigge+N+Sg+Gen: tige
    tigge+N+Sg+Acc: tige
    tigge+N+Sg+Ill: tiigán
    tigge+N+Sg+Loc: tiggeest
    tigge+N+Sg+Com: tiggijn
    tigge+N+Sg+Abe: tigettáá
    tigge+N+Ess: tiggen
    tigge+N+Par: tigged
    tigge+N+Pl+Nom: tigeh
    tigge+N+Pl+Gen: [tiigij, tigij]
    tigge+N+Pl+Acc: tiigijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Ill: tiggijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Loc: tiigijn
    tigge+N+Pl+Com: tigijguin
    tigge+N+Pl+Abe: tigijttáá

  Noun - utke:
    utke+N+Sg+Nom: utke
    utke+N+Sg+Gen: uđhe
    utke+N+Sg+Acc: uđhe
    utke+N+Sg+Ill: uutkán
    utke+N+Sg+Loc: uđheest
    utke+N+Sg+Com: uđhijn
    utke+N+Sg+Abe: uđhettáá
    utke+N+Ess: utken
    utke+N+Par: utked
    utke+N+Pl+Nom: uđheh
    utke+N+Pl+Gen: [uuđhij, uđhij]
    utke+N+Pl+Acc: uuđhijd
    utke+N+Pl+Ill: uđhijd
    utke+N+Pl+Loc: uuđhijn
    utke+N+Pl+Com: uđhijguin
    utke+N+Pl+Abe: uđhijttáá

  Noun - kukse:
    kukse+N+Sg+Nom: kukse
    kukse+N+Sg+Gen: kuvse
    kukse+N+Sg+Acc: kuvse
    kukse+N+Sg+Ill: kuuksán
    kukse+N+Sg+Loc: [kuvseest, kuvsseest]
    kukse+N+Sg+Com: kuvssijn
    kukse+N+Sg+Abe: kuvsettáá
    kukse+N+Ess: kuksen
    kukse+N+Par: kuksed
    kukse+N+Pl+Nom: kuvseh
    kukse+N+Pl+Gen: [kuuvsij, kuvsij]
    kukse+N+Pl+Acc: kuuvsijd
    kukse+N+Pl+Ill: kuvssijd
    kukse+N+Pl+Loc: kuuvsijn
    kukse+N+Pl+Com: kuvsijguin
    kukse+N+Pl+Abe: kuvsijttáá
    
  Noun - vahe:
    vahe+N+Sg+Nom: vahe
    vahe+N+Sg+Gen: vave
    vahe+N+Sg+Acc: vave
    vahe+N+Sg+Ill: vahan
    vahe+N+Sg+Loc: vavveest
    vahe+N+Sg+Com: vovvijn
    vahe+N+Sg+Abe: vavettáá
    vahe+N+Ess: vahheen
    vahe+N+Par: vahheed
    vahe+N+Pl+Nom: vaveh
    vahe+N+Pl+Gen: [voovij, vovij]
    vahe+N+Pl+Acc: voovijd
    vahe+N+Pl+Ill: vovvijd
    vahe+N+Pl+Loc: voovijn
    vahe+N+Pl+Com: vovijguin
    vahe+N+Pl+Abe: vovijttáá
